ch.aff
FLAG             long    # two-character affix identifiers
#=======================================================================================================================
# [A5] PREFIX - SIMULTANEOUS  achá-
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: 
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX A5 Y 3
PFX A5 0 achá [^áaeiou] SIMULT
PFX A5 0 achá' [^á] SIMULT
PFX A5 1 achá'a [á] SIMULT


#=======================================================================================================================
# [A6] PREFIX - Barely,Slightly  chat-
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: (hesitation, without, barely, hardly, slightly, (negative valence))
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX A6 Y 1
PFX A6 0 chat . 'barely'


#=======================================================================================================================
# [A7] PREFIX - TANSMUTE  fa'-
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: To make into / fashion into / change X into Y -- triggers Vowel Fronting
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX A7 Y 76
PFX A7 0 fa' . 'turn_into'		## will this over-generate? Need to force fronting... this might allow anything
PFX A7 h fa'k [aei] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 o fa'e [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 u fa'i [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 bå fa'ba [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 bo fa'be [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 bu fa'bi [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 blå fa'bla [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 blu fa'bli [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 brå fa'bra [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 bro fa'bre [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 bru fa'bri [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 chå fa'cha [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 cho fa'che [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 chu fa'chi [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 då fa'da [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 do fa'de [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 du fa'di [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 få fa'fa [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 fo fa'fe [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 fu fa'fi [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 frå fa'fra [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 fru fa'fri [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 gå fa'ga [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 go fa'ge [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 gu fa'gi [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 glo fa'gle [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 grå fa'gra [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 gru fa'gri [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 hå fa'ka [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 ho fa'ke [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 hu fa'ki [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 hai fa'kai . 'turn_into'
PFX A7 hao fa'kao . 'turn_into'
PFX A7 hoe fa'koe . 'turn_into'
PFX A7 hou fa'kou . 'turn_into'
PFX A7 hue fa'kue . 'turn_into'
PFX A7 hui fa'kui . 'turn_into'
PFX A7 kå fa'ka [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 ko fa'ke [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 ku fa'ki [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 klå fa'kla [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 kru fa'kri [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 lå fa'la [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 lo fa'le [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 lu fa'li [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 må fa'ma [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 mo fa'me [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 mu fa'mi [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 nå fa'na [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 no fa'ne [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 nu fa'ni [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 ngå fa'nga [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 ngo fa'nge [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 ngu fa'ngi [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 på fa'pa [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 po fa'pe [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 pu fa'pi [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 plå fa'pla [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 plo fa'ple [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 plu fa'pli [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 pro fa'pre [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 ro fa're [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 ru fa'ri [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 så fa'sa [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 so fa'se [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 su fa'si [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 slu fa'sli [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 tå fa'ta [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 to fa'te [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 tu fa'ti [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 trå fa'tra [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 tro fa'tre [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 tru fa'tri [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 yo fa'ye [^aeiou] 'turn_into'
PFX A7 yu fa'yi [^aeiou] 'turn_into'


#=======================================================================================================================
# [A8] PREFIX - AGENTIVE  gá'-
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: 
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX A8 Y 2
PFX A8 0 gá' [^á] AGT
PFX A8 1 gá'a [á] AGT


#=======================================================================================================================
# [A9] PREFIX - HABITUAL  há-
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: 
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX A9 Y 2
PFX A9 0 há' [^á] HAB
PFX A9 1 há'a [á] HAB


#=======================================================================================================================
# [AA] PREFIX - PROSPECTIVE  ké-
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: 
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX AA Y 2
PFX AA 0 ké [^é] PROSP
PFX AA 1 ké'e [é] PROSP


#=======================================================================================================================
# [AB] PREFIX - CAUSATIVE  na'-
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: 
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX AB Y 1
PFX AB 0 na' . CAUS


#=======================================================================================================================
# [AC] PREFIX - PLURAL  man-
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: 
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX AC Y 7
PFX AC 0 man . PL
PFX AC 0 mang [g] PL
PFX AC 1 mang [k] PL
PFX AC 1 man [t] PL
PFX AC 1 mañ [s] PL
PFX AC 1 mam [pf] PL
PFX AC ch mañ . PL


#=======================================================================================================================
# [AD] PREFIX - PASSIVE  ma-
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: 
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX AD Y 2
PFX AD 0 ma [^aeiou] PASS
PFX AD 1 ma' [aeiou] PASS


#=======================================================================================================================
# [AE] PREFIX - AUGMENTATIVE  lá-
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: 
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX AE Y 2
PFX AE 0 lá [^á] AUG
PFX AE 1 lá'a [á] AUG


#=======================================================================================================================
# [AF] PREFIX - MORE_OF_[N]  pinat-
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: 
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX AF Y 1
PFX AF 0 pinat . 'more_of_N'


#=======================================================================================================================
# [AG] PREFIX - ORDINAL  mina'-
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: 
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX AG Y 1
PFX AG 0 mina' . ORD


#=======================================================================================================================
# [AH] SUFFIX - APPLICATIVE  -i, -yi, -gue
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: (increases number of grammatical arguments)  -- stimulates regressive vowel harmony (raising)
#=======================================================================================================================
SFX AH Y 64
SFX AH 0 i . APPL
SFX AH a ayi . APPL
SFX AH e iyi . APPL
SFX AH o uyi . APPL
SFX AH å' ayi . APPL
SFX AH åf afi . APPL
SFX AH åk aki . APPL
SFX AH åm ami . APPL
SFX AH ån ani . APPL
SFX AH ång angi . APPL
SFX AH åp api . APPL
SFX AH ås asi . APPL
SFX AH åt ati . APPL
SFX AH e' iyi . APPL
SFX AH ef ifi . APPL
SFX AH ek iki . APPL
SFX AH em imi . APPL
SFX AH en ini . APPL
SFX AH eng ingi . APPL
SFX AH ep ipi . APPL
SFX AH es isi . APPL
SFX AH et iti . APPL
SFX AH o' uyi . APPL
SFX AH of ufi . APPL
SFX AH ok uki . APPL
SFX AH om umi . APPL
SFX AH on uni . APPL
SFX AH ong ungi . APPL
SFX AH op upi . APPL
SFX AH os usi . APPL
SFX AH ot uti . APPL
SFX AH å' å'i . APPL
SFX AH a' a'i . APPL
SFX AH e' i'i . APPL
SFX AH i' i'i . APPL
SFX AH o' u'i . APPL
SFX AH u' u'i . APPL
SFX AH ak ågue . APPL
SFX AH åk ågue . APPL
SFX AH ek ogue . APPL
SFX AH ik ugue . APPL
SFX AH ok ogue . APPL
SFX AH uk ugue . APPL
SFX AH ae ayi . APPL
SFX AH ai ayi . APPL
SFX AH ao ågue . APPL
SFX AH au ågue . APPL
SFX AH ea eayi . APPL
SFX AH ei eiyi . APPL
SFX AH ek ogue . APPL
SFX AH eo ogue . APPL
SFX AH eu ogue . APPL
SFX AH ia iayi . APPL
SFX AH ie iyi . APPL
SFX AH io iogue . APPL
SFX AH iu ugue . APPL
SFX AH oa ogue . APPL
SFX AH oe ogue . APPL
SFX AH oi oiyi . APPL
SFX AH ou ogue . APPL
SFX AH ua uayi . APPL
SFX AH ue uiyi . APPL
SFX AH ui uiyi . APPL
SFX AH uo uogue . APPL


#=======================================================================================================================
# [AI] SUFFIX - 'covertly',SECRETLY  -guan
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: Do something covertly, secretly, against someone's wishes, unintentionally
#=======================================================================================================================
SFX AI Y 1
SFX AI 0 guan . 'covertly'


#=======================================================================================================================
# [AJ] SUFFIX - DELIMITATIVE  -ñaihon
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: For a little bit, immediately
#=======================================================================================================================
SFX AJ Y 4
SFX AJ 0 ñaihon [^aeiou] DELIM
SFX AJ 0 nñaihon [aeiou] DELIM
SFX AJ 0 -ñaihon [^aeiou] DELIM
SFX AJ 0 n-ñaihon [aeiou] DELIM
